Indiana, session 2026, HB1292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-13-2-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. "Agent", for purposes of IC 9-21-3.6, has the
meaning set forth in IC 9-21-3.6-1.
SECTION 2. IC 9-13-2-6.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.2. "Automated traffic enforcement safety device",
for purposes of IC 9-21-3.6, has the meaning set forth in
IC 9-21-3.6-2.
SECTION 3. IC 9-13-2-110.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 110.6. "Municipality", for
purposes of IC 9-21-3.6, has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-11.
SECTION 4. IC 9-13-2-121, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2020,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 121. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection subsections (b) and (c), "owner" means a person, other than
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


a lienholder, that:
(1) holds the property in or title to, as applicable, a vehicle,
manufactured home, mobile home, off-road vehicle, snowmobile,
or watercraft; or
(2) is entitled to the use or possession of, as applicable, a vehicle,
manufactured home, off-road vehicle, snowmobile, or watercraft,
through a lease or other agreement intended to operate as a
security.
(b) "Owner" for purposes of IC 9-18.1-14.5, has the meaning set
forth in 33 CFR 174.3.
(c) "Owner", for purposes of IC 9-21-3.6, has the meaning set
forth in IC 9-21-3.6-4.
SECTION 5. IC 9-13-2-128.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 128.5. "Postsecondary
educational institution", for purposes of IC 9-21-3.6, has the
meaning set forth in IC 9-21-3.6-5.
SECTION 6. IC 9-14-13-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 193, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The bureau may disclose certain
personal information that is not highly restricted personal information
if the person requesting the information provides proof of identity and
represents that the use of the personal information will be strictly
limited to at least one (1) of the following:
(1) For use by a government agency, including a court or law
enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or a person
acting on behalf of a government agency in carrying out its
functions, including an agent in carrying out its
responsibilities under IC 9-21-3.6.
(2) For use in connection with matters concerning:
(A) motor vehicle or driver safety and theft;
(B) motor vehicle emissions;
(C) motor vehicle product alterations, recalls, or advisories;
(D) performance monitoring of motor vehicles, motor vehicle
parts, and dealers;
(E) motor vehicle market research activities, including survey
research;
(F) the removal of nonowner records from the original owner
records of motor vehicle manufacturers; and
(G) motor fuel theft under IC 24-4.6-5.
(3) For use in the normal course of business by a business or its
agents, employees, or contractors, but only:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(A) to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted
by an individual to the business or its agents, employees, or
contractors; and
(B) if information submitted to a business is not correct or is
no longer correct, to obtain the correct information only for
purposes of preventing fraud by pursuing legal remedies
against, or recovering on a debt or security interest against, the
individual.
(4) For use in connection with a civil, a criminal, an
administrative, or an arbitration proceeding in a court or
government agency or before a self-regulatory body, including the
service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation, and
the execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or under
an order of a court.
(5) For use in research activities, and for use in producing
statistical reports, as long as the personal information is not
published, redisclosed, or used to contact the individuals who are
the subject of the personal information.
(6) For use by an insurer, an insurance support organization, or a
self-insured entity, or the agents, employees, or contractors of an
insurer, an insurance support organization, or a self-insured entity
in connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud
activities, rating, or underwriting.
(7) For use in providing notice to the owners of towed or
impounded vehicles.
(8) For use by a licensed private investigative agency or licensed
security service for a purpose allowed under this section.
(9) For use by an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or
verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver's
license that is required under the Commercial Motor Vehicle
Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. 31131 et seq.).
(10) For use in connection with the operation of private toll
transportation facilities.
(11) For any use in response to requests for individual motor
vehicle records when the bureau has obtained the written consent
of the person to whom the personal information pertains.
(12) For bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations
when the bureau has obtained the written consent of the person to
whom the personal information pertains.
(13) For use by any person, when the person demonstrates, in a
form and manner prescribed by the bureau, that written consent
has been obtained from the individual who is the subject of the
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


information.
(14) For any other use specifically authorized by law that is
related to the operation of a motor vehicle or public safety.
However, this section does not affect the use of anatomical gift
information on a person's driver's license or identification document
issued by the bureau, nor does this section affect the administration of
anatomical gift initiatives in Indiana.
SECTION 7. IC 9-14-13-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 193, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) An authorized recipient of
personal information, except a recipient under section 7(11) or 7(12)
of this chapter, and except as provided in subsection (e), may resell
or redisclose the information for any use allowed under section 7 of this
chapter, except for a use under section 7(11) or 7(12) of this chapter.
(b) An authorized recipient of a record under section 7(11) of this
chapter may resell or redisclose personal information for any purpose.
(c) An authorized recipient of personal information under
IC 9-14-12-8 and section 7(12) of this chapter may resell or redisclose
the personal information for use only in accordance with section 7(12)
of this chapter.
(d) Except for a recipient under section 7(11) of this chapter, a
recipient who resells or rediscloses personal information is required to
maintain and make available for inspection to the bureau, upon request,
for at least five (5) years, records concerning:
(1) each person that receives the information; and
(2) the permitted use for which the information was obtained.
(e) An agent who carries out responsibilities under IC 9-21-3.6
and is a recipient of personal information under section 7(1) of this
chapter may not resell or redisclose the personal information for
any purpose.
SECTION 8. IC 9-18.1-3-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) If the bureau receives a
referral to suspend the registration of a vehicle under IC 9-21-3.6,
the bureau shall suspend the registration of the vehicle used in the
ordinance violation until the owner pays the civil penalty and
reinstatement fees under IC 9-21-3.6 and subsection (b).
(b) The bureau may impose a fee to reinstate a registration
suspended under this section.
SECTION 9. IC 9-19-13-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The state school bus
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


committee established by IC 20-27-3-1 shall adopt and enforce rules
under IC 4-22-2 not inconsistent with this chapter to govern the design
and operation of all school buses used for the transportation of school
children when owned and operated by a school corporation or privately
owned and operated under contract with an Indiana school corporation.
The rules must by reference be made a part of such a contract with a
school corporation. Each school corporation, officer and employee of
the school corporation, and person employed under contract by a
school district is subject to those rules.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a school corporation may
use an automated traffic enforcement safety device on a school bus
under IC 9-21-3.6.
SECTION 10. IC 9-21-3.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.6. Automated Traffic Enforcement Safety Devices
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agent" means a person that:
(1) provides services to a county or municipality;
(2) operates, maintains, leases, or licenses automated traffic
enforcement safety devices as authorized by a county or
municipality; or
(3) is authorized to review and assemble a recorded image
captured by an automated traffic enforcement safety device
for review by a police officer employed by a county or
municipality.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "automated traffic enforcement
safety device" means a photographic device, radar device, laser
device, or other electrical or mechanical device or devices designed
to:
(1) record the speed of a motor vehicle;
(2) obtain a clear recorded image of the rear of the motor
vehicle and the license plate affixed to the motor vehicle at the
time of a violation;
(3) indicate on at least one (1) recorded image the date, time,
and location of the violation; and
(4) undergo an annual calibration check, the results of which
are kept on file with the county or municipality that uses the
automated traffic enforcement safety device.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "municipality" means a city or
town.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "owner" means a person in
whose name a motor vehicle is registered under any of the
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


following:
(1) IC 9-18.1.
(2) The law of another state.
(3) The law of a foreign country.
(4) The International Registration Plan.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "postsecondary educational
institution" means a postsecondary school that provides an
organized program of collegiate study directly creditable toward
a baccalaureate degree for at least two (2) years.
Sec. 6.(a) Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a)(8), a county or
municipality may adopt an ordinance to use an automated traffic
enforcement safety device to enforce a violation of:
(1) IC 9-21-12-1(a); or
(2) a speed limit established under section 11 of this chapter.
(b) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) must be adopted
as follows:
(1) In a municipality, by the legislative body of the
municipality.
(2) In a county subject to IC 36-2-3.5 or IC 36-3-1, by the
legislative body of the county.
(3) In any other county, by the executive of the county.
(c) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) is subject to an
interlocal agreement under IC 36-1-7.
Sec. 7. A school corporation may enter into an interlocal
agreement under IC 36-1-7 with a county or municipality for the
installation, operation, notice processing, administration,
maintenance, and enforcement of an automated traffic
enforcement safety device on a school bus to enforce a violation
under this chapter.
Sec. 8.(a) A municipality, county, or school corporation that
uses an automated traffic enforcement safety device may enter into
a contract with an agent for the installation, operation, notice
processing, administration, and maintenance of an automated
traffic enforcement safety device.
(b) An agent is not required to be licensed under IC 25-30-1.
(c) The records, documents, and books kept by an agent are not
considered public records (as defined in IC 5-14-3-2(r)).
Sec. 9. (a) If a county or municipality adopts an ordinance under
section 6 of this chapter, the ordinance must include the following
regarding the automated traffic enforcement safety device:
(1) That an automated traffic enforcement safety device must
comply with an international standard for operating an
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


automated traffic enforcement safety device.
(2) That the automated traffic enforcement safety device is
maintained in accordance with specified self-test performance
standards.
(3) That an ordinance adopted under this chapter may be
challenged pursuant to the requirements of IC 34-13-6.
(b) If a county or municipality adopts an ordinance under
section 6 of this chapter, the ordinance must include the following
regarding a violation:
(1) That a police officer employed by the county or
municipality:
(A) must review and approve an image recorded by the
automated traffic enforcement safety device before notice
of an ordinance violation may be forwarded to the owner
of the motor vehicle; and
(B) may not forward notice of an ordinance violation to an
owner under clause (A) if, in the opinion of the police
officer, it was not possible for the operator of the motor
vehicle to safely avoid committing the ordinance violation
due to inclement weather conditions.
(2) Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, that the
owner of a motor vehicle identified through an automated
traffic enforcement safety device is liable for the civil penalty
for a violation under this chapter.
(3) The defenses to a violation under section 14 of this
chapter.
(4) The civil penalty to be assessed for a violation under
section 13 of this chapter.
(5) That an owner may pay a civil penalty for a violation by
electronic means.
(6) That failure to pay the civil penalty for a violation under
this chapter will result in the suspension of the registration of
the owner's motor vehicle.
(7) That a county or municipality may bring an action under
IC 36-1-6 to enforce an ordinance or action taken under this
chapter.
(c) A county or municipality that adopts an ordinance under
section 6 of this chapter shall publish notice of the location of each
automated traffic enforcement safety device on the website of the
county or municipality.
Sec. 10. (a) A county or municipality that uses an automated
traffic enforcement safety device to detect a violation under this
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


chapter must install a sign at least five hundred (500) feet before
the placement of the automated traffic enforcement safety device.
(b) A sign installed under subsection (a) must:
(1) notify a driver of the existence of the automated traffic
enforcement safety device to enforce a violation under this
chapter; and
(2) conform to the Indiana Manual on Uniform Traffic
Control Devices for Streets and Highways adopted under
IC 9-21-2-1.
Sec. 11. A county or municipality may adopt an ordinance to
establish a speed limit that is enforced by an automated traffic
enforcement safety device under this chapter if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The county or municipality, in consultation with the
Indiana department of transportation, may establish a speed
limit by ordinance on a state highway upon which an
elementary school (as defined in IC 20-18-2-4), a high school
(as defined in IC 20-18-2-7), or a postsecondary educational
institution is located. However, a speed limit adopted by an
ordinance under this subdivision is valid only if the following
conditions exist:
(A) The speed limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per
hour.
(B) The speed zone does not exceed two thousand five
hundred (2,500) feet from the perimeter of the school or
institution.
(C) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be a
sign located where the speed zone begins or as near as
practical to the point where the speed zone begins
indicating the speed limit.
(D) The Indiana department of transportation has been
notified by certified mail regarding the location and speed
limit of the speed zone.
(2) A county or municipality may establish a speed limit on a
street or highway upon which an elementary school (as
defined in IC 20-18-2-4), a high school (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-7), or a postsecondary educational institution is
located, if the street or highway is under the jurisdiction of
the county or municipality, respectively. However, a speed
limit adopted by an ordinance under this subdivision is valid
only if the following conditions exist:
(A) The speed limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


hour within an urban district and not less than thirty (30)
miles per hour outside an urban district.
(B) The speed zone does not exceed two thousand five
hundred (2,500) feet from the perimeter of the school or
institution.
(C) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be a
sign located where the speed zone begins or as near as
practical to the point where the speed zone begins
indicating the speed limit. If the school operates on a
twelve (12) month schedule, there must be a sign indicating
that the school is an all year school.
Sec. 12. (a) A school corporation that uses an automated traffic
enforcement safety device to enforce an ordinance adopted under
this chapter must forward a recorded image produced by the
automated traffic enforcement safety device to the law
enforcement agency of the county or municipality in which the
school corporation is located for review and approval by a police
officer employed by the law enforcement agency before notice of
the ordinance violation may be sent to the owner of the motor
vehicle.
(b) A police officer described in subsection (a) may not send
notice of the ordinance violation to the owner of the motor vehicle
if, in the opinion of the police officer, the operator of the motor
vehicle could not have safely avoided committing the ordinance
violation due to inclement weather conditions.
Sec. 13. (a) Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a)(10)(B), a county or
municipality may impose a civil penalty for an ordinance violation
under this chapter in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250).
(b) A county or municipality may impose a fee associated with
the electronic processing of the civil penalty imposed under
subsection (a).
(c) A county or municipality must apply at least fifty percent
(50%) of the amount of the civil penalty imposed under subsection
(a) to defray the cost to install, operate, and maintain an automated
traffic enforcement safety device.
(d) The remaining money from the civil penalty imposed under
subsection (a) must be transferred to the general fund of the county
or municipality to be used for public safety and infrastructure.
Sec. 14. (a) It is a defense under this chapter if any of the
following apply:
(1) The owner provides an affidavit signed under the penalty
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


of perjury stating:
(A) the owner of the motor vehicle was engaged in the
business of renting or leasing vehicles under written
agreements;
(B) the motor vehicle was in the care, custody, or control
of an individual other than the owner or an employee of
the owner under a written agreement for the rental or
lease of the motor vehicle for a period of not more than
sixty (60) days; and
(C) the name and address of the individual who was
renting or leasing the motor vehicle;
at the time of the alleged violation.
(2) The owner provides an affidavit signed under the penalty
of perjury stating:
(A) the dealer license plate displayed by the motor vehicle
was issued to a person licensed under IC 9-32-6;
(B) the motor vehicle was in the care, custody, or control
of an individual other than the owner or an employee of
the owner of the motor vehicle using the dealer license
plate as authorized under IC 9-32-6-2 or IC 9-32-6-7; and
(C) the name and address of the individual who was using
the motor vehicle;
at the time of the alleged violation.
(3) If the owner provides an affidavit signed under the penalty
of perjury stating the owner was not operating the motor
vehicle at the time of the alleged violation and the name and
address of the individual operating the motor vehicle at the
time of the alleged violation.
(4) If the owner provides an affidavit signed under the penalty
of perjury stating that:
(A) the motor vehicle; or
(B) the license plate of the motor vehicle;
was stolen before the alleged violation occurred and was not
under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the
alleged violation.
(5) The owner was driving an authorized emergency vehicle
and did not endanger life or property.
(6) The owner was complying with a lawful order or direction
of a police officer.
(7) The owner yielded the right-of-way to an authorized
emergency vehicle.
(8) The owner was part of a funeral procession.
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(9) A traffic citation was issued to the operator of the motor
vehicle, who was not the owner of the motor vehicle, for the
ordinance violation by a police officer.
(b) If the owner of a motor vehicle submits the evidence
required under subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3), the court shall
send by first class mail notice of the violation to the individual
identified as the operator of the motor vehicle at the time of the
violation.
(c) Proof provided under subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3) creates
a rebuttable presumption that the individual identified by the
owner as the operator of the motor vehicle at the time of the
violation was the individual operating the motor vehicle at the time
of the violation.
(d) In addition to an affidavit described in subsection (a)(4), the
owner must submit proof that a police report was filed concerning
the stolen motor vehicle or stolen license plate.
Sec. 15. (a) Subject to the requirements under IC 36-1-6, a
county or municipality shall send by first class mail a notice to the
owner of the motor vehicle that the owner failed to contest the
violation or pay the civil penalty under this chapter.
(b) A notice under subsection (a) must inform an owner of the
following:
(1) That a referral to suspend the registration of the motor
vehicle under section 16 of this chapter will be sent to the
bureau not later than thirty (30) days after the notice under
subsection (a) is mailed if the violation is not paid.
(2) That a referral under section 16 of this chapter will result
in the suspension of the registration of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 16. (a) A county or municipality shall give a written referral
to suspend the registration of a motor vehicle to the bureau not
later than thirty (30) days after the notice under section 15 of this
chapter is mailed to the owner of the motor vehicle if the owner has
not:
(1) contested the ordinance violation; or
(2) paid the civil penalty.
(b) A referral under subsection (a) must include:
(1) information regarding the name of the owner of the motor
vehicle, the license plate number, and registration year;
(2) the date, time, and location of the violation;
(3) the date when the notice required under section 15 of this
chapter was mailed; and
(4) the seal of the local authority.
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


Sec. 17. (a) If the bureau receives a referral under section 16 of
this chapter, the bureau shall immediately suspend the registration
of the motor vehicle.
(b) The bureau shall send by first class mail a written notice to
the owner not later than thirty (30) days after receiving a referral
under section 16 of this chapter that informs the owner of the
motor vehicle of:
(1) the suspension of the registration of the motor vehicle;
(2) the reason for the suspension; and
(3) the process by which to have the registration of the motor
vehicle reinstated.
Sec. 18. The bureau shall reinstate the registration of a motor
vehicle that is suspended under this chapter if the owner presents
the bureau with proof that:
(1) the civil penalty; and
(2) the reinstatement fee under IC 9-18.1-3-8.5(b);
is paid.
Sec. 19. (a) A recorded image produced by an automated traffic
enforcement safety device that does not show an alleged violation
must be destroyed not later than thirty (30) days after the image is
recorded, unless otherwise determined by a court order.
(b) A recorded image produced by an automated traffic
enforcement safety device that shows an alleged violation must be
destroyed not more than ninety (90) days after the final disposition
of the proceeding or payment of the civil penalty, unless otherwise
determined by a court order.
Sec. 20. (a) The bureau may not assess points under the point
system for a violation under this chapter.
(b) A violation under this chapter is not considered to be a
traffic offense (as defined in IC 9-13-2-183).
(c) Information concerning a violation under this chapter may
not be included on a driving record established and maintained by
the bureau.
(d) A violation under this chapter may not be used to determine
rates for motor vehicle insurance.
SECTION 11. IC 9-21-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2024,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsections (e) and
(f), whenever a local authority in the authority's jurisdiction determines
that the maximum speed permitted under this chapter is greater or less
than reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist on a
highway or part of a highway, the local authority may determine and
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


declare a reasonable and safe maximum limit on the highway. The
maximum limit declared under this section may do any of the
following:
(1) Decrease the limit within urban districts, but not to less than
twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) Increase the limit within an urban district, but not to more than
fifty-five (55) miles per hour during daytime and fifty (50) miles
per hour during nighttime.
(3) Decrease the limit outside an urban district, but not to less
than thirty (30) miles per hour.
(4) Decrease the limit in an alley, but to not less than five (5)
miles per hour.
(5) Increase the limit in an alley, but to not more than twenty (20)
miles per hour.
The local authority must perform an engineering and traffic
investigation before a determination may be made to change a speed
limit under subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (5) or before the speed limit on
a highway with a functional classification of arterial or major collector
within an urban district may be decreased to less than twenty-five (25)
miles per hour under subdivision (1). An engineering and traffic
investigation is not required to decrease the speed limit to twenty (20)
miles per hour on a highway with a functional classification of minor
collector or local road in an urban district.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f), a local authority in the
authority's jurisdiction shall determine by an engineering and traffic
investigation the proper maximum speed for all local streets and shall
declare a reasonable and safe maximum speed permitted under this
chapter for an urban district. However, an engineering and traffic study
is not required to be performed for the local streets in an urban district
under this subsection if the local authority determines that the proper
maximum speed in the urban district is not less than twenty-five (25)
miles per hour.
(c) An altered limit established under this section is effective at all
times or during hours of darkness or at other times as may be
determined when appropriate signs giving notice of the altered limit are
erected on the street or highway.
(d) Except as provided in this subsection and notwithstanding
IC 9-21-3.6 or IC 36-1-3-8(a), a local authority may not alter a speed
limit on a highway or extension of a highway in the state highway
system. A city or town may establish speed limits on state highways
upon which a school is located. However, a speed limit established
under this subsection is valid only if the following conditions exist:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(1) The limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) The limit is imposed only in the immediate vicinity of the
school.
(3) Children are present.
(4) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be:
(A) a sign located:
(i) where the reduced speed zone begins; or
(ii) as near as practical to the point where the reduced speed
zone begins;
indicating the reduced speed limit; and
(B) a sign located at the end of the reduced speed zone
indicating:
(i) the speed limit for the section of highway that follows; or
(ii) the end of the reduced speed zone.
(5) The Indiana department of transportation has been notified of
the limit imposed by certified mail.
(e) A local authority may decrease a limit on a street to not less than
fifteen (15) miles per hour if the following conditions exist:
(1) The street is located within a park or playground established
under IC 36-10.
(2) The:
(A) board established under IC 36-10-3;
(B) board established under IC 36-10-4; or
(C) park authority established under IC 36-10-5;
requests the local authority to decrease the limit.
(3) The speed zone is properly signed.
(f) A city, town, or county may establish speed limits on a street or
highway upon which a school is located if the street or highway is
under the jurisdiction of the city, town, or county, respectively.
However, a speed limit established under this subsection is valid only
if the following conditions exist:
(1) The limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) The limit is imposed only in the immediate vicinity of the
school.
(3) Children are present.
(4) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be:
(A) a sign located where the reduced speed zone begins or as
near as practical to the point where the reduced speed zone
begins indicating the reduced speed limit and a sign located at
the end of the reduced speed zone indicating the end of the
reduced speed zone; and
(B) if the school operates on a twelve (12) month schedule, a
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


sign indicating that the school is an all year school.
Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a), a city, town, or county may
establish speed limits on a street or highway upon which a school
is located if the street or highway is under the jurisdiction of the
city, town, or county, respectively, under IC 9-21-3.6.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (h), a person who exceeds a
speed limit established by a local authority under this section commits
a Class C infraction.
(h) A person who exceeds a speed limit that is established under
subsection (d) or (f) commits a Class B infraction.
SECTION 12. IC 9-21-12-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person who drives a vehicle that:
(1) meets or overtakes from any direction a school bus stopped on
a roadway or a private road and is not stopped before reaching the
school bus when the arm signal device specified in IC 9-21-12-13
is in the device's extended position; or
(2) proceeds before the arm signal device is no longer extended;
commits a Class A infraction.
(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed under this section, the
court may suspend the person's driving privileges:
(1) for ninety (90) days; or
(2) if the person has committed at least one (1) previous offense
under this section or IC 9-21-8-52(b), for one (1) year.
(c) This section is applicable only if the school bus is in substantial
compliance with the markings required by the state school bus
committee.
(d) There is a rebuttable presumption that the owner of the vehicle
involved in the violation of this section committed the violation. This
presumption does not apply to the owner of a vehicle involved in the
violation of this section if the owner routinely engages in the business
of renting the vehicle for periods of thirty (30) days or less.
(e) A violation of subsection (a) may be enforced under
IC 9-21-3.6.
SECTION 13. IC 9-30-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. This section does not apply to a violation of
an ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-3.6. If a court convicts a person
for a moving traffic offense and the person is known or believed by the
court not to be the owner of the motor vehicle, the court shall, within
seven (7) days after entering the conviction, deposit with the United
States Postal Service, first class postage prepaid, notice addressed to
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


the owner of the motor vehicle giving the owner the following
information:
(1) The name and address of the person convicted.
(2) The name and address of the owner of the motor vehicle.
(3) The offense upon which the conviction was made.
(4) The date of arrest of the person convicted and the location of
the place of the offense.
(5) The license plate number of the motor vehicle.
(6) The driver's or chauffeur's license number of the person
convicted.
(7) The date of the conviction and the name of the court making
the conviction.
SECTION 14. IC 20-27-10-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. A school corporation may use
an automated traffic enforcement safety device on a school bus in
accordance with IC 9-21-3.6.
SECTION 15. IC 27-1-22-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) As used in this section,
"motor vehicle insurance" means any type of insurance described
in IC 27-1-5-1, Class 2(f).
(b) As used in this section, "rating plan" means the rating
schedule or rating plan of an insurer concerning premium rates for
motor vehicle insurance that has been filed with the commissioner
and is in effect under section 4 of this chapter.
(c) An insurer may not set the premium rate for a policy of
motor vehicle insurance for an individual who has committed a
violation under:
(1) IC 9-21-3.6; or
(2) IC 9-21-12-1(a) enforced under IC 9-21-3.6;
at an amount higher than the applicable rate set forth in the rating
plan due to the fact that the individual has committed a violation
of an ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-3.6, or of IC 9-21-12-1(a)
enforced under IC 9-21-3.6.
(d) A violation of this section is an unfair and deceptive act or
practice in the business of insurance under IC 27-4-1-4.
SECTION 16. IC 27-4-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The following are hereby defined as unfair
methods of competition and unfair and deceptive acts and practices in
the business of insurance:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(1) Making, issuing, circulating, or causing to be made, issued, or
circulated, any estimate, illustration, circular, or statement:
(A) misrepresenting the terms of any policy issued or to be
issued or the benefits or advantages promised thereby or the
dividends or share of the surplus to be received thereon;
(B) making any false or misleading statement as to the
dividends or share of surplus previously paid on similar
policies;
(C) making any misleading representation or any
misrepresentation as to the financial condition of any insurer,
or as to the legal reserve system upon which any life insurer
operates;
(D) using any name or title of any policy or class of policies
misrepresenting the true nature thereof; or
(E) making any misrepresentation to any policyholder insured
in any company for the purpose of inducing or tending to
induce such policyholder to lapse, forfeit, or surrender the
policyholder's insurance.
(2) Making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or placing
before the public, or causing, directly or indirectly, to be made,
published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public,
in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of
a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio or
television station, or in any other way, an advertisement,
announcement, or statement containing any assertion,
representation, or statement with respect to any person in the
conduct of the person's insurance business, which is untrue,
deceptive, or misleading.
(3) Making, publishing, disseminating, or circulating, directly or
indirectly, or aiding, abetting, or encouraging the making,
publishing, disseminating, or circulating of any oral or written
statement or any pamphlet, circular, article, or literature which is
false, or maliciously critical of or derogatory to the financial
condition of an insurer, and which is calculated to injure any
person engaged in the business of insurance.
(4) Entering into any agreement to commit, or individually or by
a concerted action committing any act of boycott, coercion, or
intimidation resulting or tending to result in unreasonable
restraint of, or a monopoly in, the business of insurance.
(5) Filing with any supervisory or other public official, or making,
publishing, disseminating, circulating, or delivering to any person,
or placing before the public, or causing directly or indirectly, to
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


be made, published, disseminated, circulated, delivered to any
person, or placed before the public, any false statement of
financial condition of an insurer with intent to deceive. Making
any false entry in any book, report, or statement of any insurer
with intent to deceive any agent or examiner lawfully appointed
to examine into its condition or into any of its affairs, or any
public official to which such insurer is required by law to report,
or which has authority by law to examine into its condition or into
any of its affairs, or, with like intent, willfully omitting to make a
true entry of any material fact pertaining to the business of such
insurer in any book, report, or statement of such insurer.
(6) Issuing or delivering or permitting agents, officers, or
employees to issue or deliver, agency company stock or other
capital stock, or benefit certificates or shares in any common law
corporation, or securities or any special or advisory board
contracts or other contracts of any kind promising returns and
profits as an inducement to insurance.
(7) Making or permitting any of the following:
(A) Unfair discrimination between individuals of the same
class and equal expectation of life in the rates or assessments
charged for any contract of life insurance or of life annuity or
in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any
other of the terms and conditions of such contract. However,
in determining the class, consideration may be given to the
nature of the risk, plan of insurance, the actual or expected
expense of conducting the business, or any other relevant
factor.
(B) Unfair discrimination between individuals of the same
class involving essentially the same hazards in the amount of
premium, policy fees, assessments, or rates charged or made
for any policy or contract of accident or health insurance or in
the benefits payable thereunder, or in any of the terms or
conditions of such contract, or in any other manner whatever.
However, in determining the class, consideration may be given
to the nature of the risk, the plan of insurance, the actual or
expected expense of conducting the business, or any other
relevant factor.
(C) Excessive or inadequate charges for premiums, policy
fees, assessments, or rates, or making or permitting any unfair
discrimination between persons of the same class involving
essentially the same hazards, in the amount of premiums,
policy fees, assessments, or rates charged or made for:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(i) policies or contracts of reinsurance or joint reinsurance,
or abstract and title insurance;
(ii) policies or contracts of insurance against loss or damage
to aircraft, or against liability arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of any aircraft, or of vessels or craft,
their cargoes, marine builders' risks, marine protection and
indemnity, or other risks commonly insured under marine,
as distinguished from inland marine, insurance; or
(iii) policies or contracts of any other kind or kinds of
insurance whatsoever.
However, nothing contained in clause (C) shall be construed to
apply to any of the kinds of insurance referred to in clauses (A)
and (B) nor to reinsurance in relation to such kinds of insurance.
Nothing in clause (A), (B), or (C) shall be construed as making or
permitting any excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory
charge or rate or any charge or rate determined by the department
or commissioner to meet the requirements of any other insurance
rate regulatory law of this state.
(8) Except as otherwise expressly provided by IC 27-1-47 or
another law, knowingly permitting or offering to make or making
any contract or policy of insurance of any kind or kinds
whatsoever, including but not in limitation, life annuities, or
agreement as to such contract or policy other than as plainly
expressed in such contract or policy issued thereon, or paying or
allowing, or giving or offering to pay, allow, or give, directly or
indirectly, as inducement to such insurance, or annuity, any rebate
of premiums payable on the contract, or any special favor or
advantage in the dividends, savings, or other benefits thereon, or
any valuable consideration or inducement whatever not specified
in the contract or policy; or giving, or selling, or purchasing or
offering to give, sell, or purchase as inducement to such insurance
or annuity or in connection therewith, any stocks, bonds, or other
securities of any insurance company or other corporation,
association, limited liability company, or partnership, or any
dividends, savings, or profits accrued thereon, or anything of
value whatsoever not specified in the contract. Nothing in this
subdivision and subdivision (7) shall be construed as including
within the definition of discrimination or rebates any of the
following practices:
(A) Paying bonuses to policyholders or otherwise abating their
premiums in whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from
nonparticipating insurance, so long as any such bonuses or
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


abatement of premiums are fair and equitable to policyholders
and for the best interests of the company and its policyholders.
(B) In the case of life insurance policies issued on the
industrial debit plan, making allowance to policyholders who
have continuously for a specified period made premium
payments directly to an office of the insurer in an amount
which fairly represents the saving in collection expense.
(C) Readjustment of the rate of premium for a group insurance
policy based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at
the end of the first year or of any subsequent year of insurance
thereunder, which may be made retroactive only for such
policy year.
(D) Paying by an insurer or insurance producer thereof duly
licensed as such under the laws of this state of money,
commission, or brokerage, or giving or allowing by an insurer
or such licensed insurance producer thereof anything of value,
for or on account of the solicitation or negotiation of policies
or other contracts of any kind or kinds, to a broker, an
insurance producer, or a solicitor duly licensed under the laws
of this state, but such broker, insurance producer, or solicitor
receiving such consideration shall not pay, give, or allow
credit for such consideration as received in whole or in part,
directly or indirectly, to the insured by way of rebate.
(9) Requiring, as a condition precedent to loaning money upon the
security of a mortgage upon real property, that the owner of the
property to whom the money is to be loaned negotiate any policy
of insurance covering such real property through a particular
insurance producer or broker or brokers. However, this
subdivision shall not prevent the exercise by any lender of the
lender's right to approve or disapprove of the insurance company
selected by the borrower to underwrite the insurance.
(10) Entering into any contract, combination in the form of a trust
or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of commerce in the
business of insurance.
(11) Monopolizing or attempting to monopolize or combining or
conspiring with any other person or persons to monopolize any
part of commerce in the business of insurance. However,
participation as a member, director, or officer in the activities of
any nonprofit organization of insurance producers or other
workers in the insurance business shall not be interpreted, in
itself, to constitute a combination in restraint of trade or as
combining to create a monopoly as provided in this subdivision
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


and subdivision (10). The enumeration in this chapter of specific
unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts and
practices in the business of insurance is not exclusive or
restrictive or intended to limit the powers of the commissioner or
department or of any court of review under section 8 of this
chapter.
(12) Requiring as a condition precedent to the sale of real or
personal property under any contract of sale, conditional sales
contract, or other similar instrument or upon the security of a
chattel mortgage, that the buyer of such property negotiate any
policy of insurance covering such property through a particular
insurance company, insurance producer, or broker or brokers.
However, this subdivision shall not prevent the exercise by any
seller of such property or the one making a loan thereon of the
right to approve or disapprove of the insurance company selected
by the buyer to underwrite the insurance.
(13) Issuing, offering, or participating in a plan to issue or offer,
any policy or certificate of insurance of any kind or character as
an inducement to the purchase of any property, real, personal, or
mixed, or services of any kind, where a charge to the insured is
not made for and on account of such policy or certificate of
insurance. However, this subdivision shall not apply to any of the
following:
(A) Insurance issued to credit unions or members of credit
unions in connection with the purchase of shares in such credit
unions.
(B) Insurance employed as a means of guaranteeing the
performance of goods and designed to benefit the purchasers
or users of such goods.
(C) Title insurance.
(D) Insurance written in connection with an indebtedness and
intended as a means of repaying such indebtedness in the
event of the death or disability of the insured.
(E) Insurance provided by or through motorists service clubs
or associations.
(F) Insurance that is provided to the purchaser or holder of an
air transportation ticket and that:
(i) insures against death or nonfatal injury that occurs during
the flight to which the ticket relates;
(ii) insures against personal injury or property damage that
occurs during travel to or from the airport in a common
carrier immediately before or after the flight;
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(iii) insures against baggage loss during the flight to which
the ticket relates; or
(iv) insures against a flight cancellation to which the ticket
relates.
(14) Refusing, because of the for-profit status of a hospital or
medical facility, to make payments otherwise required to be made
under a contract or policy of insurance for charges incurred by an
insured in such a for-profit hospital or other for-profit medical
facility licensed by the Indiana department of health.
(15) Refusing to insure an individual, refusing to continue to issue
insurance to an individual, limiting the amount, extent, or kind of
coverage available to an individual, or charging an individual a
different rate for the same coverage, solely because of that
individual's blindness or partial blindness, except where the
refusal, limitation, or rate differential is based on sound actuarial
principles or is related to actual or reasonably anticipated
experience.
(16) Committing or performing, with such frequency as to
indicate a general practice, unfair claim settlement practices (as
defined in section 4.5 of this chapter).
(17) Between policy renewal dates, unilaterally canceling an
individual's coverage under an individual or group health
insurance policy solely because of the individual's medical or
physical condition.
(18) Using a policy form or rider that would permit a cancellation
of coverage as described in subdivision (17).
(19) Violating IC 27-1-22-25, IC 27-1-22-26, or IC 27-1-22-26.1
concerning motor vehicle insurance rates.
(20) Violating IC 27-8-21-2 concerning advertisements referring
to interest rate guarantees.
(21) Violating IC 27-8-24.3 concerning insurance and health plan
coverage for victims of abuse.
(22) Violating IC 27-8-26 concerning genetic screening or testing.
(23) Violating IC 27-1-15.6-3(b) concerning licensure of
insurance producers.
(24) Violating IC 27-1-38 concerning depository institutions.
(25) Violating IC 27-8-28-17(c) or IC 27-13-10-8(c) concerning
the resolution of an appealed grievance decision.
(26) Violating IC 27-8-5-2.5(e) through IC 27-8-5-2.5(j) (expired
July 1, 2007, and removed) or IC 27-8-5-19.2 (expired July 1,
2007, and repealed).
(27) Violating IC 27-2-21 concerning use of credit information.
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(28) Violating IC 27-4-9-3 concerning recommendations to
consumers.
(29) Engaging in dishonest or predatory insurance practices in
marketing or sales of insurance to members of the United States
Armed Forces as:
(A) described in the federal Military Personnel Financial
Services Protection Act, P.L.109-290; or
(B) defined in rules adopted under subsection (b).
(30) Violating IC 27-8-19.8-20.1 concerning stranger originated
life insurance.
(31) Violating IC 27-2-22 concerning retained asset accounts.
(32) Violating IC 27-8-5-29 concerning health plans offered
through a health benefit exchange (as defined in IC 27-19-2-8).
(33) Violating a requirement of the federal Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148), as amended by the federal
Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (P.L.
111-152), that is enforceable by the state.
(34) After June 30, 2015, violating IC 27-2-23 concerning
unclaimed life insurance, annuity, or retained asset account
benefits.
(35) Willfully violating IC 27-1-12-46 concerning a life insurance
policy or certificate described in IC 27-1-12-46(a).
(36) Violating IC 27-1-37-7 concerning prohibiting the disclosure
of health care service claims data.
(37) Violating IC 27-4-10-10 concerning virtual claims payments.
(38) Violating IC 27-1-24.5 concerning pharmacy benefit
managers.
(39) Violating IC 27-7-17-16 or IC 27-7-17-17 concerning the
marketing of travel insurance policies.
(40) Violating IC 27-1-49 concerning individual prescription drug
rebates.
(41) Violating IC 27-1-50 concerning group prescription drug
rebates.
(42) Violating IC 27-1-22-29 concerning the premium rate for
a policy of motor vehicle insurance if an individual has
committed a violation under IC 9-21-3.6 or enforced under
IC 9-21-3.6.
(b) Except with respect to federal insurance programs under
Subchapter III of Chapter 19 of Title 38 of the United States Code, the
commissioner may, consistent with the federal Military Personnel
Financial Services Protection Act (10 U.S.C. 992 note), adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 to:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(1) define; and
(2) while the members are on a United States military installation
or elsewhere in Indiana, protect members of the United States
Armed Forces from;
dishonest or predatory insurance practices.
SECTION 17. IC 34-6-2.1-129, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 176, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 129. "Moving traffic violation", for
purposes of IC 34-28-5, means a violation of:
(1) a statute defining an infraction; or
(2) an ordinance, other than a violation under IC 9-21-3.6;
that applies when a motor vehicle is in motion.
SECTION 18. IC 34-28-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.173-2025,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A defendant against whom a judgment is
entered is liable for costs. Costs are part of the judgment and may not
be suspended except under IC 9-30-3-12. Whenever a judgment is
entered against a person for the commission of two (2) or more civil
violations (infractions or ordinance violations), the court may waive the
person's liability for costs for all but one (1) of the violations. This
subsection does not apply to judgments entered for violations
constituting:
(1) Class D infractions; or
(2) Class C infractions for unlawfully parking in a space reserved
for a person with a physical disability under IC 5-16-9-5 or
IC 5-16-9-8.
(b) If a judgment is entered:
(1) for a violation constituting:
(A) a Class D infraction; or
(B) a Class C infraction for unlawfully parking in a space
reserved for a person with a physical disability under
IC 5-16-9-5 or IC 5-16-9-8; or
(2) in favor of the defendant in any case;
the defendant is not liable for costs.
(c) Except for costs, and except as provided in subsections (e), and
(f), and (g), and IC 9-21-5-11(e), the funds collected as judgments for
violations of statutes defining infractions shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
(d) A judgment may be entered against a defendant under this
section or section 4 of this chapter upon a finding by the court that the
defendant:
(1) violated:
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


(A) a statute defining an infraction; or
(B) an ordinance; or
(2) consents to entry of judgment for the plaintiff upon a pleading
of nolo contendere for a moving traffic violation.
(e) The funds collected for an infraction judgment described in
section 4(h) of this chapter shall be transferred to a dedicated county
fund. The money in the dedicated county fund does not revert to the
county general fund or state general fund and may be used, after
appropriation by the county fiscal body, only for the following
purposes:
(1) To pay compensation of commissioners appointed under
IC 33-33-49.
(2) To pay costs of the county's guardian ad litem program.
(f) The funds collected for an infraction judgment described in
section 4(i) of this chapter shall be transferred to a dedicated toll
revenue fund created as part of a project that is located within a
metropolitan planning area (as defined by 23 U.S.C. 134) and that
connects the state of Indiana with the commonwealth of Kentucky. The
money in the fund does not revert to the county general fund or state
general fund and may be used only to pay the cost of operating,
maintaining, and repairing the tolling system for a project that is
located within a metropolitan planning area (as defined by 23 U.S.C.
134) and that connects the state of Indiana with the commonwealth of
Kentucky, including major repairs, replacements, and improvements.
(g) This subsection applies only to a violation of IC 9-21-12-1(a)
that is enforced through IC 9-21-3.6. Notwithstanding subsection
(c), a civil penalty collected for a violation of IC 9-21-12-1(a) as a
judgment against a person to whom this subsection applies shall be
transferred in accordance with IC 9-21-3.6. To the extent a person
to whom this subsection applies is liable for costs for a violation of
IC 9-21-12-1(a), the costs may be deducted only from the judgment
and may not cause the person to be liable for an amount greater
than the civil penalty under IC 9-21-3.6.
SECTION 19. IC 36-1-6-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Certain
ordinances may be enforced by a municipal corporation without
proceeding in court through:
(1) an admission of violation before the violations clerk under
IC 33-36; or
(2) administrative enforcement under section 9 of this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a), a proceeding to enforce an
ordinance must be brought in accordance with IC 34-28-5, section 4 of
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137


this chapter, or both.
(c) An ordinance defining a moving traffic violation may not be
enforced under IC 33-36 and must be enforced in accordance with
IC 34-28-5.
(d) An ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-3.6 may be enforced
under IC 33-36 or IC 34-28-5.
2026 IN 1292—LS 6313/DI 137